Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1758
Election or appointment of board and committees.

(1) The board of directors of any credit union shall consist of an odd number of directors, at least five in number, to be elected by and from the members. Elections shall be held at the annual meeting or in such other manner as provided by the bylaws. All members of the board of directors shall hold office for such terms as provided by the bylaws, except that the terms of the board members shall be staggered so that an approximately equal number of terms expire each year.

(2) The supervisory committee shall have at least three members. The members shall be appointed by the board of directors or elected by the credit union members in such numbers and for terms as provided in the bylaws. No member of the supervisory committee shall be a director, officer, loan officer, credit committee member, or employee of the credit union while serving on the supervisory committee.

(3) If the bylaws provide for a credit committee, the committee shall have at least three members. The members shall be appointed by the board of directors or elected by the credit union members in such number and for such terms as provided in the bylaws. The credit committee shall have and perform the duties as provided in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not provide for a credit committee, the board of directors shall have and perform the duties of the credit committee or delegate the duties as it so chooses.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 58.